Idaho, session 2025, H0408.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 30, Title 63, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 63-3029N, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
63-3029N. MIDDLE INCOME PROPERTY DEVELOPMENT TAX CREDIT. (1) There is
hereby created the Idaho middle income property development tax credit. Be-
ginning in tax year 2025, there shall be allowed a credit against the taxes
imposed by this chapter to any taxpayer that develops and sells a deed re-
stricted property as defined in this section. The amount of the credit for
the development and sale of a deed restricted property shall be equal to the
difference between the sale price of the deed restricted property and the ap-
praised value of the deed restricted property at the time of sale as deter-
mined by a third-party appraiser. If the amount of the credit is greater than
the tax liability of the taxpayer, the excess amount may be carried forward
for a period that does not exceed the next ten (10) taxable years.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Area median income" means the median income for the metropolitan
statistical area, or county if no metropolitan statistical area exists,
where a property is located, as determined by the United States depart-
ment of housing and urban development.
(b) "Deed restricted property" means a newly constructed residen-
tial structure that previously did not exist, once it is completed and
taxable, on land that is subject to a fee simple deed that is properly
recorded in the county recorder's office for the county in which the
property is located and that contains enforceable covenants running
with the land as recognized by Idaho law that restrict the sale of the
property, at a minimum, as follows:
(i) At the time of purchase, the purchaser of the property shall
belong to a household that had a total income for the most recently
completed income tax year that was at or below one hundred twenty
percent (120%) of the most current available area median income
for the area in which the property is located;
(ii) The property must be used as the purchaser's homestead pur-
suant to section 63-602G, Idaho Code;


(iii) The purchaser is required to enter into a contract with a
deed restriction program manager and such deed restriction pro-
gram manager is obligated to verify that the purchaser meets the
requirements set forth in subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this para-
graph. The purchaser shall be required to disclose all household
income information to the deed restriction program manager, in-
cluding the purchaser's most recent household tax returns and pay
stubs for the previous six (6) months. The contract shall also re-
quire regular visits to the property by an agent of the deed re-
striction program manager to verify continuing homestead exemp-
tion qualification as long as the purchaser owns the property. If
a purchaser no longer meets the homestead qualification provided
in this section, the purchaser shall be required to notify the deed
restriction program manager;
(iv) The purchaser is restricted from selling the property at a
price greater than one (1) of the following formulas as designated
in the deed of trust:
1. The amount equal to the increase in value of the prop-
erty using the inflation rate from the time of the purchase
of the property, including any fixtures or improvements to
the property made by the purchaser, to the time of sale. The
inflation rate used shall be the unadjusted consumer price
index for all urban consumers as published by the United
States department of labor;
2. Twenty-five percent (25%) of total market appreciation
of the property, including any fixtures or improvements to
the property made by the purchaser, which shall equal the
difference between the appraised value at the time of the
original purchase and the appraised value at the time of sale
as determined by a third-party appraiser; or
3. A fixed annual percentage accretion over the purchase
price of the property, including any fixtures or improve-
ments to the property made by the purchaser, not to exceed
five percent (5%); and
(v) The covenants running with the land in such deed, including
the restrictions provided in this paragraph, shall be binding on
the property for at least sixty (60) years.
(c) "Deed restriction program manager" means a not-for-profit entity
exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of
the Internal Revenue Code established for the purpose of managing deed
restricted properties. At a minimum, a program manager shall perform
the following contractual duties for a deed restricted property forming
the basis for the tax credit provided by this section:
(i) Verify that the purchaser of a deed restricted property meets
the income requirements set forth in paragraph (b)(i) of this sub-
section, by requesting, receiving, and reviewing the income tax
returns of the purchaser and the purchaser's household for the
most recent tax year and the pay stubs of the purchaser and the
purchaser's household for the previous six (6) months;


(ii) Verify that the purchaser of a deed restricted property is us-
ing the property as the purchaser's homestead pursuant to section
63-602G, Idaho Code, by requesting and receiving a signed certi-
fication from the purchaser that upon the purchase, the property
shall qualify as the purchaser's homestead pursuant to section
63-602G, Idaho Code; and
(iii) Conduct home visits of the deed restricted property at least
two (2) times per year for as long as the purchaser owns the prop-
erty, to verify that the purchaser is using the property as the
purchaser's homestead pursuant to section 63-602G, Idaho Code.
(d) "Fixtures" shall have the same meaning as provided in section
63-201(9), Idaho Code.
(e) "Household" means individuals over eighteen (18) years of age
living together in the same residence, except for children of house-
hold members who are living in the home and are enrolled and attending
postsecondary education institutions, trade schools, or vocational
schools. The term does not include bona fide lessees, tenants, or
roomers and boarders on contract.
(f) "Improvements" shall have the same meaning as provided in section
63-201(11), Idaho Code.
(3) The state tax commission shall prescribe forms for the purpose of
claiming the Idaho middle income property development tax credit.
(4) Taxpayers claiming the credit shall:
(a) Enter into a written contract with a deed restriction program man-
ager whereby such program manager is obligated to verify purchaser eli-
gibility pursuant to subsection (2)(b)(i) and (ii) of this section, and
to provide ongoing compliance with the deed restrictions as provided in
subsection (2) of this section; and
(b) Retain all documents related to the sale of the deed restricted
property, including a copy of the recorded deed and the covenants run-
ning with the land and the contract with the deed restriction program
manager. The taxpayer shall retain such documents for ten (10) years
after the filing of a return claiming the tax credit and shall submit
such documents to the state tax commission upon request.
(5) The state tax commission shall deny or recapture credits claimed by
a taxpayer for claiming credit amounts not authorized by the provisions of
this section.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 30, Title 63, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 63-3029O, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
63-3029O. MIDDLE INCOME LAND TRUST TAX CREDIT. (1) There is hereby
created the Idaho middle income land trust tax credit. Beginning in tax year
2025, there shall be allowed a credit against the taxes imposed by this chap-
ter to any taxpayer that donates fee simple land to a land trust in accordance
with the provisions of this section.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Area median income" means the median income for the metropolitan
statistical area, or county if no metropolitan statistical area exists,


where a housing unit is located, as determined by the United States de-
partment of housing and urban development.
(b) "Fixtures" shall have the same meaning as provided in section
63-201(9), Idaho Code.
(c) "Household" means individuals over eighteen (18) years of age
living together in the same residence, except for children of house-
hold members who are living in the home and are enrolled and attending
postsecondary education institutions, trade schools, or vocational
schools. The term does not include bona fide lessees, tenants, or
roomers and boarders on contract.
(d) "Improvements" shall have the same meaning as provided in section
63-201(11), Idaho Code.
(e) "Land trust" means a not-for-profit entity exempt from federal
income taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue
Code that holds real property in trust for the purpose of leasing such
real property to lessees who purchase and own residential housing units
constructed on the leased land. Such housing units shall be subject to a
land lease that is recognized by Idaho law. Such land lease with a land
trust shall have, at a minimum, the following requirements:
(i) The land lease shall be for a term of at least ninety-nine (99)
years;
(ii) The lessee shall belong to a household with a total income at
or below one hundred percent (100%) of the area median income where
the housing unit is located;
(iii) The housing unit being purchased must be the lessee's pri-
mary dwelling place as that term is defined in section 63-701,
Idaho Code;
(iv) The total liquid assets of the lessee's household, includ-
ing cash, bank account funds, stocks, bonds, and any other asset
that can be readily converted to United States currency, and not
including retirement accounts, shall be limited to an amount equal
to twelve (12) months of the household's recurring expenses, and
shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) at the
time of entering into the land lease. Households with liquid as-
sets greater than such limit shall qualify if the funds greater
than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) are used to pay for
closing transaction costs for entering into the lease and for
the purchase of the housing unit, and after such costs are sub-
tracted from the purchaser's liquid assets, such assets are below
twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000); and
(v) The lessee shall not sell any housing unit located on the
property at a price greater than one (1) of the following formulas,
to be designated in the lease:
1. The amount equal to the increase in value of the housing
unit, including any fixtures or improvements to the housing
unit made by the lessee, using the inflation rate from the
time of purchase to the time of sale as determined by a third-
party appraiser. The inflation rate used shall be the unad-
justed consumer price index for all urban consumers as pub-
lished by the United States department of labor;


2. Twenty-five percent (25%) of total market appreciation
as determined by the difference between the purchase price
of the housing unit, including any fixtures or improvements
to the housing unit made by the lessee, and the appraised
value at the time of resale; or
3. A fixed annual percentage accretion over the purchase
price of the housing unit, including any fixtures or im-
provements to the housing unit made by the lessee, not to
exceed five percent (5%).
(f) "Lessee" means the person who leases property from a land trust and
who owns a residential housing unit located on such land that serves as
such lessee's primary dwelling place as that term is defined in section
63-701, Idaho Code.
(3)(a) For the donation of real property to a land trust that, by the
terms of its governing corporate documents, services lessee households
with an income of no more than eighty percent (80%) of the area median
income:
(i) If the taxpayer purchased the property, the taxpayer shall
receive a tax credit in the amount of fifty percent (50%) of the
difference between the purchase price of the property and the ap-
praised value of such property at the time of the donation as de-
termined by a third-party appraiser; or
(ii) If there was no purchase price when the taxpayer acquired the
property, the taxpayer shall receive a tax credit in the amount
of fifty percent (50%) of the difference between the tax basis of
the property at the time the taxpayer acquired the property and
the appraised value at the time of the donation as determined by a
third-party appraiser.
(b) For the donation of real property to a land trust that, by the terms
of its governing corporate documents, services lessee households with
an income greater than eighty percent (80%) but no more than one hundred
percent (100%) of the area median income:
(i) If the taxpayer purchased the property, the taxpayer shall
receive a tax credit in the amount of forty percent (40%) of the
difference between the purchase price of the property at the time
the taxpayer purchased the property and the appraised value at the
time the taxpayer donated the property as determined by a third-
party appraiser; or
(ii) If there was no purchase price when the taxpayer acquired the
property, the taxpayer shall receive a tax credit in the amount of
forty percent (40%) of the difference between the tax basis at the
time the taxpayer acquired the property and the appraised value
at the time the taxpayer donated the property as determined by a
third-party appraiser.
(c) If the amount of any credit under this subsection is greater than
the tax liability of the taxpayer, the excess amount may be carried for-
ward by the taxpayer for a period that does not exceed the next ten (10)
taxable years.
(4) The state tax commission shall prescribe forms for the purpose of
claiming the Idaho middle income land trust tax credit.


(5) Taxpayers claiming the credit shall:
(a) Certify that, before donating the property to a land trust pursuant
to the provisions of this section, the taxpayer requested and received a
certification from a lawful agent of the land trust that the land trust
properly qualifies pursuant to the provisions of this section; and
(b) Retain all documents related to the transfer of the property to the
land trust, including a copy of the deed, the land lease to which the
donated property shall be subject, and the certification pursuant to
paragraph (a) of this subsection, for ten (10) years after the filing of
a return claiming the tax credit and shall submit such documents to the
state tax commission upon request.
(6) The state tax commission shall deny or recapture credits claimed by
a taxpayer for claiming credit amounts not authorized by the provisions of
this section.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval, and retroactively to January 1, 2025.